Wyoming, session 2025, HB0054.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 5-1-106(f), 5-3-112(a)(intro) and
(iii), 5-9-131(a)(intro) and 5-13-116 by creating new
subsections (b) and (c) are amended to read:
5-1-106. Retirement of judges of the supreme court or
district courts; pension; assignment of retired judges.
(f) Any justice of the supreme court, chancery court
judge or district court judge of this state, who has
retired pursuant to the provisions of this section, and who
is not practicing law, may, notwithstanding his retirement,
be called upon, with his consent, at the request of a
district court judge or circuit court judge, with the
consent of the chief justice, or by the chief justice, and
assigned to service on any court. A retired justice or
judge shall receive as a salary during any period of
assignment an amount equal to the current compensation of a
judge of the court to which he is assigned. The salary
received by a retired justice or judge during any period of
assignment shall not affect the receipt of any retirement
allowance received by the retired justice or judge during
the period of assignment. Assignments of retired justices
or judges under this section shall only be made in a manner
that does not jeopardize the qualified status of state
retirement plans established by the Wyoming legislature.
When called to serve, a retired judge or justice shall
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0054
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
receive the same per diem and travel allowances as allowed
active judges or justices. Per diem, allowances and
compensation shall be paid from the contingent fund of the
court to which the judge or justice is assigned.
5-3-112. Assignment to circuit court judge or
chancery court judge.
(a) A judge of the district court may assign to a
circuit court judge or a chancery court judge any case or
proceeding within the jurisdiction of the district court
subject only to the following restrictions:
(iii) Consent of each plaintiff and each
defendant in a civil action; wherein the amount in
controversy is greater than fifty thousand dollars
($50,000.00); and
5-9-131. Assignment to district court judge or
chancery court judge.
(a) A circuit court judge may assign to a district
court judge or a chancery court judge any case or
proceeding within the jurisdiction of the circuit court
subject only to the following restrictions:
5-13-116. Powers generally; expenses of judges when
acting in a circuit court or in a district court.
(b) A judge of the chancery court may hear any case
or proceeding assigned to the chancery court by a district
court in accordance with W.S. 5-3-112(a) or a circuit court
in accordance with W.S. 5-9-131.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0054
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(c) The expenses of any chancery court judge holding
court in any circuit court pursuant to assignment under
W.S. 5-9-131 or in any district court pursuant to
assignment under W.S. 5-3-112(a), including the judge's
traveling expenses, and the judge's expenses while holding
court, shall be charged to the fund of the court where the
judge is holding court pursuant to assignment under W.S.
5-3-112(a) or 5-9-131.
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0054
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
4